Nebraska, session 109, LB6.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB6 LB6
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-416, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-416 (1) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, it shall be unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally: (a)
To manufacture, distribute, deliver, dispense, or possess with intent to
manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a controlled substance; or
(b) to create, distribute, or possess with intent to distribute a
counterfeit controlled substance.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (4), (5), (7), (8), (9), and
(10) of this section, any person who violates subsection (1) of this
section with respect to: (a) A controlled substance classified in
Schedule I, II, or III of section 28-405 which is an exceptionally
hazardous drug shall be guilty of a Class II felony; (b) any other
controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III of section
28-405 shall be guilty of a Class IIA felony; or (c) a controlled
substance classified in Schedule IV or V of section 28-405 shall be
guilty of a Class IIIA felony.
(3) A person knowingly or intentionally possessing a controlled
substance, except marijuana or any substance containing a quantifiable
amount of the substances, chemicals, or compounds described, defined, or
delineated in subdivision (c)(27) of Schedule I of section 28-405, unless
such substance was obtained directly or pursuant to a medical order
issued by a practitioner authorized to prescribe while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by the act, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony. A person
shall not be in violation of this subsection if section 28-472 or 28-1701
applies.
(4)(a) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, any person eighteen years of age or older who knowingly or
intentionally manufactures, distributes, delivers, dispenses, or
possesses with intent to manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a
-2-

LB6 LB6
2025 2025
controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance (i) to a
person under the age of eighteen years, (ii) in, on, or within one
thousand feet of the real property comprising a public or private
elementary, vocational, or secondary school, a community college, a
public or private college, junior college, or university, or a
playground, or (iii) within one hundred feet of a public or private youth
center, public swimming pool, or video arcade facility shall be punished
by the next higher penalty classification than the penalty prescribed in
subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of this section, depending upon
the controlled substance involved, for the first violation and for a
second or subsequent violation shall be punished by the next higher
penalty classification than that prescribed for a first violation of this
subsection, but in no event shall such person be punished by a penalty
greater than a Class IB felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Playground means any outdoor facility, including any parking lot
appurtenant to the facility, intended for recreation, open to the public,
and with any portion containing three or more apparatus intended for the
recreation of children, including sliding boards, swingsets, and
teeterboards;
(ii) Video arcade facility means any facility legally accessible to
persons under eighteen years of age, intended primarily for the use of
pinball and video machines for amusement, and containing a minimum of ten
pinball or video machines; and
(iii) Youth center means any recreational facility or gymnasium,
including any parking lot appurtenant to the facility or gymnasium,
intended primarily for use by persons under eighteen years of age which
regularly provides athletic, civic, or cultural activities.
(5)(a) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, it shall be unlawful for any person eighteen years of age or older
to knowingly and intentionally employ, hire, use, cause, persuade, coax,
-3-

LB6 LB6
2025 2025
induce, entice, seduce, or coerce any person under the age of eighteen
years to manufacture, transport, distribute, carry, deliver, dispense,
prepare for delivery, offer for delivery, or possess with intent to do
the same a controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance.
(b) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances Act,
it shall be unlawful for any person eighteen years of age or older to
knowingly and intentionally employ, hire, use, cause, persuade, coax,
induce, entice, seduce, or coerce any person under the age of eighteen
years to aid and abet any person in the manufacture, transportation,
distribution, carrying, delivery, dispensing, preparation for delivery,
offering for delivery, or possession with intent to do the same of a
controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance.
(c) Any person who violates subdivision (a) or (b) of this
subsection shall be punished by the next higher penalty classification
than the penalty prescribed in subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of
this section, depending upon the controlled substance involved, for the
first violation and for a second or subsequent violation shall be
punished by the next higher penalty classification than that prescribed
for a first violation of this subsection, but in no event shall such
person be punished by a penalty greater than a Class IB felony.
(6) It shall not be a defense to prosecution for violation of
subsection (4) or (5) of this section that the defendant did not know the
age of the person through whom the defendant violated such subsection.
(7) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to cocaine or any mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of cocaine in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
-4-

LB6 LB6
2025 2025
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(8) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to base cocaine (crack) or any mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of base cocaine in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(9) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to heroin or any mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of heroin in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(10) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its
isomers, or with respect to methamphetamine, its salts, optical isomers,
and salts of its isomers, in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(11) Any person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana
weighing more than one ounce but not more than one pound shall be guilty
-5-

LB6 LB6
2025 2025
of a Class III misdemeanor.
(12) Any person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana
weighing more than one pound shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(13) Except as provided in section 28-1701, any person knowingly or
intentionally possessing marijuana weighing one ounce or less or any
substance containing a quantifiable amount of the substances, chemicals,
or compounds described, defined, or delineated in subdivision (c)(27) of
Schedule I of section 28-405 shall:
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of an infraction, receive a
citation, be fined three hundred dollars, and be assigned to attend a
course as prescribed in section 29-433 if the judge determines that
attending such course is in the best interest of the individual
defendant;
(b) For the second offense, be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor,
receive a citation, and be fined four hundred dollars and may be
imprisoned not to exceed five days; and
(c) For the third and all subsequent offenses, be guilty of a Class
IIIA misdemeanor, receive a citation, be fined five hundred dollars, and
be imprisoned not to exceed seven days.
(14) Any person convicted of violating this section, if placed on
probation, shall, as a condition of probation, satisfactorily attend and
complete appropriate treatment and counseling on drug abuse provided by a
program authorized under the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act or
other licensed drug treatment facility.
(15) Any person convicted of violating this section, if sentenced to
the Department of Correctional Services, shall attend appropriate
treatment and counseling on drug abuse.
(16)(a) Any person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of
this section shall be punished by the next higher penalty classification
than the penalty prescribed in subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of
this section if:
-6-

LB6 LB6
2025 2025
(i) The (16) Any person knowingly or intentionally possessed
possessing a firearm while in violation of subsection (1) of this
section; or
(ii) Such violation resulted in the use of the controlled substance
and directly and proximately caused the death of, or serious bodily
injury to, another person. shall be punished by the next higher penalty
classification than the penalty prescribed in subsection (2), (7), (8),
(9), or (10) of this section, but in no event shall such person be
punished by
(b) A penalty enhanced under this subsection shall in no event
result in a penalty greater than a Class IB felony.
(17) A person knowingly or intentionally in possession of money used
or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of subsection (1) of
this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(18) In addition to the existing penalties available for a violation
of subsection (1) of this section, including any criminal attempt or
conspiracy to violate subsection (1) of this section, a sentencing court
may order that any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms,
conveyances, or electronic communication devices as defined in section
28-833 or any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or
accessories related to electronic communication devices be forfeited as a
part of the sentence imposed if it finds by clear and convincing evidence
adduced at a separate hearing in the same prosecution, following
conviction for a violation of subsection (1) of this section, and
conducted pursuant to section 28-1601, that any or all such property was
derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of
subsection (1) of this section.
(19) In addition to the penalties provided in this section:
(a) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating this section
is eighteen years of age or younger and has one or more licenses or
permits issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:
-7-

LB6 LB6
2025 2025
(i) For the first offense, the court may, as a part of the judgment
of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses or permits
for thirty days and (B) require such person to attend a drug education
class;
(ii) For a second offense, the court may, as a part of the judgment
of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses or permits
for ninety days and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than
twenty and no more than forty hours of community service and to attend a
drug education class; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, the court may, as a part of
the judgment of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses
or permits for twelve months and (B) require such person to complete no
fewer than sixty hours of community service, to attend a drug education
class, and to submit to a drug assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug
counselor; and
(b) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating this section
is eighteen years of age or younger and does not have a permit or license
issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:
(i) For the first offense, the court may, as part of the judgment of
conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any
permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would
otherwise be eligible until thirty days after the date of such order and
(B) require such person to attend a drug education class;
(ii) For a second offense, the court may, as part of the judgment of
conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any
permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would
otherwise be eligible until ninety days after the date of such order and
(B) require such person to complete no fewer than twenty hours and no
more than forty hours of community service and to attend a drug education
class; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, the court may, as part of
-8-

LB6 LB6
2025 2025
the judgment of conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from
obtaining any permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such
person would otherwise be eligible until twelve months after the date of
such order and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than sixty
hours of community service, to attend a drug education class, and to
submit to a drug assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug counselor.
A copy of an abstract of the court's conviction or adjudication
shall be transmitted to the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to
sections 60-497.01 to 60-497.04 if a license or permit is impounded or a
juvenile is prohibited from obtaining a license or permit under this
subsection.
Sec. 2. Original section 28-416, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-9-